Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-1007.09
Financial
reports relating to limited English proficiency; department; duties; report;
appeal of department decisions.

(1)(a) The annual financial
report required pursuant to section 79-528 shall include:

(i) The amount of the limited English proficiency allowance used in
the certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022 for such school
fiscal year;

(ii) The amount of federal funds received based on students who are
limited English proficient as defined by the federal program providing the
funds;

(iii) The expenditures and sources of funding for each program related
to limited English proficiency with a narrative description of the program,
the method used to allocate money to the program and within the program, and
the program's relationship to the limited English proficiency plan submitted
pursuant to section 79-1014 for such school fiscal year;

(iv) The expenditures and sources of funding for support costs directly
attributable to implementing the district's limited English proficiency plan;
and

(v) An explanation of how any required elements of the limited English
proficiency plan for such school fiscal year were met.

(b) The department shall set up accounting codes for the receipts and
expenditures required to be reported on the annual financial report pursuant
to this subsection.

(2) The department shall determine
the limited English proficiency allowance expenditures using the reported
expenditures on the annual financial report for the most recently available
complete data year that would only include in the limited English proficiency
allowance expenditures those expenditures that were used to specifically address
issues related to the education of students with limited English proficiency
or to the implementation of the limited English proficiency plan, that do
not replace expenditures that would have occurred if the students involved
in the program did not have limited English proficiency, that are not included
in other allowances, and that are paid for with noncategorical funds generated
by state or local taxes or funds distributed through the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act pursuant to the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009 or the federal
Education Jobs Fund created pursuant to Public Law 111-226. The
department shall establish a procedure to allow school districts to receive
preapproval for categories of expenditures that could be included in limited
English proficiency allowance expenditures.

(3) If the limited English
proficiency allowance expenditures do not equal 117.65 percent or more of
the limited English proficiency allowance for the most recently available
complete data year, the department shall calculate a limited English proficiency
allowance correction. The limited English proficiency allowance correction
shall equal the limited English proficiency allowance minus eighty-five percent
of the limited English proficiency allowance expenditures. If the limited
English proficiency allowance expenditures do not equal fifty percent or more
of the allowance for such school fiscal year, the school district shall also
be disqualified from receiving a limited English proficiency allowance for
the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.

(4) If the department determines
that the school district did not meet the required elements of the limited
English proficiency plan for the most recently available complete data year,
the department shall calculate a limited English proficiency allowance correction
equal to fifty percent of the limited English proficiency allowance for such
school fiscal year and the school district shall also be disqualified from
receiving a limited English proficiency allowance for the school fiscal year
for which aid is being calculated. Any limited English proficiency allowance
correction calculated pursuant to this subsection shall be added to any limited
English proficiency allowance correction calculated pursuant to subsection (3) of this section to arrive at the total limited
English proficiency allowance correction.

(5) The department may request
additional information from any school district to assist with calculations
and determinations pursuant to this section. If the school district does not
provide information upon the request of the department pursuant to this section,
the school district shall be disqualified from receiving a limited English
proficiency allowance for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated.

(6) The department shall annually
provide the Legislature with a report containing a general description of
the expenditures and funding sources for programs related to limited English
proficiency statewide and specific descriptions of the expenditures and funding
sources for programs related to limited English proficiency for each school
district.

(7) The state board shall
establish a procedure for appeal of decisions of the department to the state
board for a final determination.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 82;

Laws 2007, LB641, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB988, § 31;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 4.
February 11, 2011